New York, session 2025-2026, S7734.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 402 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the commis- 4 sioner may develop and offer number stickers to be used on motor vehi- 5 cles in the place of number plates. Such number stickers shall have the 6 same appearance, numbering system and fees as number plates pursuant to 7 this article and shall adhere directly to the body of the vehicle in the 8 same position as a number plate. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10261-04-5